dev/crh_CYRL2LAT.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

%{İ%}
%{й%}
%{☭%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
в:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
з:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
й:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
к:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
м:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
п:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
с:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ч:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ш:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
!щ:щ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
и:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

у:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
а:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
э:э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
щ:шч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ю:%{й%}ю AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
я:%{й%}я AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
е:%{й%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:%{й%}ё AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

И:%{İ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ; 

LEXICON Exception

:%{☭%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.1" ; 

LEXICON Exceptions 

бульвар:бульвар Exception "weight: 0.1" ;
пунктуация:пунктуатси%{й%}я Exception "weight: 0.1" ;
меджуль:меджуль Exception "weight: 0.1" ;
патруль:патруль Exception "weight: 0.1";
сульх:сульх Exception "weight: 0.1";
макъбуль:макъбуль Exception "weight: 0.1";
сульфид:сульфид Exception "weight: 0.1";
кульминаци:кульминаци Exception "weight: 0.1";
хулья:хулья Exception "weight: 0.1";
импульс:импульс Exception "weight: 0.1";
эмульсия:эмульси%{й%}я Exception "weight: 0.1";
бульвар:бульвар Exception "weight: 0.1";
факультет:факультет Exception "weight: 0.1";
ультрамарин:ультрамарин Exception "weight: 0.1";
ультиматум:ультиматум Exception "weight: 0.1";
консульт:консульт Exception "weight: 0.1";
хульяджы:хуль%{й%}яджы Exception "weight: 0.1";
уй:уйь Exception "weight: 0.1";
кой:койь Exception "weight: 0.1";

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
